Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1190.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1154, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1154. Grounds for suspension or revocation of license; continuing jurisdiction; civil penalties A. The holder of a license or any person named on a license pursuant to this chapter may not commit any of the following acts or omissions: 1. Abandonment of a contract or refusal to perform after submitting a bid on work without a legal excuse for the abandonment or refusal. 2. Departure from or disregard of: (a) Plans or specifications in any material respect that is prejudicial to another without the consent of the owner or the owner's duly authorized representative and without the consent of the person entitled to have the particular construction project or operation completed in accordance with such plans and specifications and code. (b) A building code of this state or any political subdivision of this state in any material respect that is prejudicial to another. 3. Violation of any rule adopted by the registrar. 4. Failure to comply with the statutes or rules governing social security, workers' compensation or unemployment insurance. 5. Misrepresentation of a material fact by the applicant in obtaining a license. 6. The doing of a fraudulent act by the licensee as a contractor resulting in another person being substantially injured.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "fraudulent act" means a material misrepresentation that a licensee makes, that is relied on by another person and that results in damage to that person or that person's property. 7. Conviction of a felony. 8. Failure in a material respect by the licensee to complete a construction project or operation for the price stated in the contract, or in any modification of the contract. 9. Attempting to evade this chapter by: (a) Aiding or abetting a licensed or unlicensed person. (b) Acting or conspiring with a licensed or unlicensed person. (c) Allowing one's license to be used by a licensed or unlicensed person. (d) Acting as agent, partner, associate or otherwise of a licensed or unlicensed person. 10. Failure by a licensee or an agent or official of a licensee to pay monies in excess of $750 when due for materials or services rendered in connection with the licensee's operations as a contractor unless the licensee proves that the licensee lacks the capacity to pay and has not received sufficient monies as payment for the particular construction work project or operation for which the services or materials were rendered or purchased. 11. Failure of a contractor to comply with any safety or labor laws or codes of the federal government, this state or political subdivisions of this state. 12. Failure in any material respect to comply with this chapter. 13. Knowingly entering into a contract with a contractor for work to be performed for which a license is required with a person that is not duly licensed in the required classification. 14. Acting in the capacity of a contractor under any license issued under this chapter in a name other than as set forth on the license. 15. False, misleading or deceptive advertising whereby any member of the public was misled and injured. 16. Knowingly contracting beyond the scope of the license or licenses of the licensee. 17. Contracting or offering to contract or submitting a bid while the license is under suspension or while the license is on inactive status. 18. Failure to notify the registrar in writing within a period of fifteen days of any disassociation of the person who qualified for the license. The licensee must qualify through another person within sixty days after the date of disassociation. 19. Subsequent discovery of facts that if known at the time of issuance of a license or the renewal of a license would have been grounds to deny the issuance or renewal of the license. 20. Having a person named on the license who is or was named on any other license in this state or in another state that is under suspension or revocation for any act or omission that occurs while the person is or was named on the license unless the prior revocation was based solely on a violation of this paragraph. 21. Continuing a new single-family residential construction project with actual knowledge that a pretreatment wood-destroying pests or organisms application was either: (a) Not performed at the required location. (b) Performed in a manner inconsistent with label requirements, state law or rules. 22. Failure to take appropriate corrective action to comply with this chapter or with rules adopted pursuant to this chapter without valid justification within a reasonable period of time after receiving a written directive from the registrar.  The written directive must set that sets forth the time within which the contractor is to complete the remedial action. The time permitted allowed for compliance may not be less than fifteen days from after the date of issuance of the directive.  A license may not be revoked or suspended nor may and any other penalty may not be imposed for a violation of this paragraph until after a hearing has been held. 23. Prohibit, threaten to prohibit, retaliate against, threaten to retaliate against or otherwise intimidate any contractor or materialman from serving a preliminary notice pursuant to section 33-992.01. 24. For contractors, failure to comply with title 44, chapter 11, article 11. B. The registrar: 1. May investigate the acts of a contractor in this state on the registrar's own motion. 2. Shall investigate the acts of a contractor in this state on the written complaint of any owner or contractor that is a party to a construction contract or a person who suffers a material loss or injury as a result of a contractor's failure to perform work in a professional and workmanlike manner or in accordance with any applicable building codes and professional industry standards. For the purposes of this paragraph: (a) "Construction contract" means a written or oral agreement relating to the construction, alteration, repair, maintenance, moving or demolition of any building, structure or improvement or relating to the contractor's excavation of or other development or improvement to land if the registrar investigates the contractor's actions under this subsection. (b) "Owner" means any person, firm, partnership, corporation, association or other organization, or a combination of any of them, that causes a building, structure or improvement to be constructed, altered, repaired, maintained, moved or demolished or that causes land to be excavated or otherwise developed or improved, whether the interest or estate of the person is in fee, as vendee under a contract to purchase, as lessee or another interest or estate less than fee, pursuant to a construction contract. (c) "Person who suffers a material loss or injury" includes a person who suffers a loss or injury due to the contractor's violation arising out of work performed under a construction contract under any provision of title 23. 3. May temporarily suspend, with or without imposition of specific conditions in addition to increased surety bond or cash deposit requirements, or permanently revoke any or all licenses issued under this chapter if the holder of the license issued pursuant to this chapter or any successor is guilty of or commits any of the acts or omissions set forth in subsection A of this section. For the purposes of this paragraph, there is a rebuttable presumption that an applicant or licensee is a successor if the applicant or licensee shares two or more of the following with the holder of a license issued pursuant to this chapter: (a) Performance of similar work in the same geographic area. (b) Premises. (c) A telephone number, fax number, email address or website. (d) Substantially the same workforce or ADMINISTRATIVE staff. (e) Tools, equipment or facilities. (f) Employment or engagement of any person who exercised SUBSTANTIAL discretionary control over the disciplined contractor. (g) Listed work EXPERIENCE of project history. C. Pursuant to this chapter, the registrar shall suspend by operation of law a license issued to a person under this chapter on notice from the department of revenue that a tax debt related to income taxes, withholding taxes or any tax imposed or administered by title 42, chapter 5 that was incurred in the operation of the licensed business has become final and the person neglects to pay or refuses to pay the tax debt. D. The expiration, cancellation, suspension or revocation of a license by operation of law or by a decision and order of the registrar or a court of law or the voluntary surrender of a license by a licensee does not deprive the registrar of jurisdiction to proceed with any investigation of or action or disciplinary proceeding against such a licensee, or to render a decision suspending or revoking such a license, or denying the renewal or right of renewal of such a license. E. The registrar may impose a civil penalty of not to exceed more than $500 on a contractor for each violation of subsection A, paragraph 22 of this section.  Civil penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the residential contractors' recovery fund. The failure by the licensee to pay any civil penalty imposed under this subsection results in the automatic revocation of the license thirty days after the effective date of the order providing for the civil penalty. A person who is or was named on a license of a contractor when an act or omission occurs that results in a civil penalty may not receive a new license under this chapter until the entire civil penalty is paid. F. The registrar may impose a civil penalty of not to exceed more than $1,000 on a contractor for each violation of subsection A, paragraph 17 of this section. Civil penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the residential contractors' recovery fund. The failure by the licensee to pay any civil penalty imposed under this subsection results in the automatic permanent revocation of the license thirty days after the effective date of the order providing for the civil penalty.  A person who is or was named on a license of a contractor when an act or omission occurs that results in a civil penalty may not receive a new license under this chapter until the entire civil penalty is paid.END_STATUTE